Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-107
Veterans graves, markers; furnish, when.

(1) The county boards of the several counties in this state shall, upon the application of the county veterans service committee, procure for and furnish to such committee some suitable and appropriate metal marker for the grave of each and every person described in subsection (2) of this section, to be placed on the grave of such soldier for the purpose of permanently marking and designating the grave for memorial purposes.

(2) A grave shall be marked pursuant to this section if the deceased person:

(a) Served in the armed forces of the United States during a period of war as defined in section 80-401.01 or during a period of actual hostilities in any war or conflict in which the United States Government was engaged prior to April 6, 1917;

(b) Was discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable conditions); and

(c) Is buried within the county.

Laws 1909, c. 135, § 1, p. 483;

R.S.1913, § 7161;

C.S.1922, § 6807;

C.S.1929, § 80-110;

R.S.1943, § 80-107;

Laws 1953, c. 324, § 6, p. 1073;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 25.